Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-105 Proceedings affecting
devolution and administration; jurisdiction of subject matter. Persons
interested in decedents' estates may apply to the registrar for determination
in the informal proceedings provided in this article, and may petition the
court for orders in formal proceedings within the court's jurisdiction
including but not limited to those described in this article. The court has
exclusive jurisdiction of formal proceedings to determine how decedents'
estates, subject to the laws of this State, are to be administered, expended,
and distributed. The court has concurrent jurisdiction of any other action or
proceeding concerning a succession or to which an estate, through a personal
representative, may be a party, including actions to determine title to
property alleged to belong to the estate, and of any action or proceeding in
which property distributed by a personal representative or its value is sought
to be subjected to rights of creditors or successors of the decedent. [L 1996, c
288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next